Massachusetts, session 194th, S2112.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any or special law to the contrary, the appropriate agencies of the
commonwealth shall develop regulations to increase standards that address safety issues in the
construction industry;
Area of review for regulations shall include but not be limited to the following:
Craft workers
• 40 hours of safety training by an approved training provider, with a 10-huor refresher
completed on an annual basis
Craft foreperson
• 62 hours of safety training by an approved training provider, with a 10-hour refresher
competed on an annual bases
of 4

Site safety manager licensing
• For any project over 50,000 square feet a Site Safety Manager is required to be on-site
at all times
• To be a site safety manager you must have:
(i) Minimum 5 years construction safety experience
(ii) 40 hours SSM course
(iii) Safety experience background check
(iv) Knowledge test: 80% correct to pass
(v)Physical exam for fitness
(vi) 3 year refresher
Concrete, steel, excavation, façade
• 62-hours of safety training by an approved training provider, with a 10-hour refresher
completed on an annual bases
Site safety and demolition plan review and enforcement
• Require major building and demolition projects to prepare and keep current a site safety
plan. The plan, and subsequent updates, should be reviewed and approved by the Authority
Having Jurisdiction and is required to be on site for inspector review
Scaffolding
of 4

• Minimum requirements for the design, permitting, erection, maintenance, and
disassembly of supported and suspended scaffolds.
• Standards include stamped and filed drawings by a licenses design professional, use of
licensed master rigger for erection and dismantling of suspended scaffolds, worker training,
debris netting and scaffold access
Concrete formwork
• Minimum standards for the design, erection, and inspection of concrete formwork
• Site specific drawings to be prepared by registered design professional
• Engineered designs submitted for review/ approval and on site for inspectors
Protection of unenclosed perimeter façade
• Minimum requirements for perimeter protection prior to façade installation
• Permitted drawing by licensed design professional, requires vertical and horizontal
safety netting or better to be installed and maintained at all unenclosed perimeters
Enhancement of sidewalk shed public protection
• Minimum standards for the design, permitting, erection, inspection, and maintenance of
sidewalk shed including adjoining property protection
• Mandatory sidewalk sheds and site scaffolding for all projects in the Boston area
Inspection and enforcement
of 4

• Provide additional resources to inspection enforcement agencies to hold all General
Contractors to elevated safety standards
• These city and state workers who have the authority to inspect project for safety
compliance per the required documentation and permitting
Retain experienced inspectors
• Reclassify local building inspectors as Massachusetts public safety official to help
retain experienced experts in high-risk Boston environments
of 4